viceverser/data/fr_ud.aff
FLAG long
SFX xC Y 49
SFX xC oire oire/ boire  is:infi
SFX xC oire uvant/ boire  is:ppre
SFX xC oire u/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX xC oire us/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX xC oire ue/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xC oire u·e/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xC oire ues/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xC oire u·es/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xC oire ois/ boire  is:ipre is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xC oire oit/ boire  is:ipre is:3sg
SFX xC oire uvons/ boire  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX xC oire uvez/ boire  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX xC oire oivent/ boire  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX xC oire uvais/ boire  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xC oire uvait/ boire  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX xC oire uvions/ boire  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX xC oire uviez/ boire  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX xC oire uvaient/ boire  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX xC oire us/ boire  is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xC oire ut/ boire  is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX xC oire ûmes/ boire  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX xC oire ûtes/ boire  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX xC oire urent/ boire  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX xC oire oirai/ boire  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX xC oire oiras/ boire  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX xC oire oira/ boire  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX xC oire oirons/ boire  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX xC oire oirez/ boire  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX xC oire oiront/ boire  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX xC oire oirais/ boire  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xC oire oirait/ boire  is:cond is:3sg
SFX xC oire oirions/ boire  is:cond is:1pl
SFX xC oire oiriez/ boire  is:cond is:2pl
SFX xC oire oiraient/ boire  is:cond is:3pl
SFX xC oire oive/ boire  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX xC oire oives/ boire  is:spre is:2sg
SFX xC oire usse/ boire  is:simp is:1sg
SFX xC oire usses/ boire  is:simp is:2sg
SFX xC oire ût/ boire  is:simp is:3sg
SFX xC oire ussions/ boire  is:simp is:1pl
SFX xC oire ussiez/ boire  is:simp is:2pl
SFX xC oire ussent/ boire  is:simp is:3pl
SFX xC oire ois/ boire  is:impe is:2sg
SFX xC oire uvons/ boire  is:impe is:1pl
SFX xC oire uvez/ boire  is:impe is:2pl
SFX xC oire u-e/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xC oire u-es/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xC oire u·e·s/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xC oire u-e-s/ boire  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX xJ Y 10
SFX xJ clure clure/ clure  is:infi
SFX xJ clure clus/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX xJ clure cluse/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xJ clure clus·e/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xJ clure cluses/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xJ clure clus·es/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xJ clure clus-e/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xJ clure clus-es/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xJ clure clus·e·s/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xJ clure clus-e-s/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX xK Y 46
SFX xK clure clure/ clure  is:infi
SFX xK clure cluant/ clure  is:ppre
SFX xK clure clus/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX xK clure cluse/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xK clure clus·e/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xK clure cluses/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xK clure clus·es/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xK clure clus/ clure  is:ipre is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xK clure clut/ clure  is:ipre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX xK clure cluons/ clure  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX xK clure cluez/ clure  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX xK clure cluent/ clure  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX xK clure cluais/ clure  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xK clure cluait/ clure  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX xK clure cluions/ clure  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX xK clure cluiez/ clure  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX xK clure cluaient/ clure  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX xK clure clûmes/ clure  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX xK clure clûtes/ clure  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX xK clure clurent/ clure  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX xK clure clurai/ clure  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX xK clure cluras/ clure  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX xK clure clura/ clure  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX xK clure clurons/ clure  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX xK clure clurez/ clure  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX xK clure cluront/ clure  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX xK clure clurais/ clure  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xK clure clurait/ clure  is:cond is:3sg
SFX xK clure clurions/ clure  is:cond is:1pl
SFX xK clure cluriez/ clure  is:cond is:2pl
SFX xK clure cluraient/ clure  is:cond is:3pl
SFX xK clure clue/ clure  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX xK clure clues/ clure  is:spre is:2sg
SFX xK clure clusse/ clure  is:simp is:1sg
SFX xK clure clusses/ clure  is:simp is:2sg
SFX xK clure clût/ clure  is:simp is:3sg
SFX xK clure clussions/ clure  is:simp is:1pl
SFX xK clure clussiez/ clure  is:simp is:2pl
SFX xK clure clussent/ clure  is:simp is:3pl
SFX xK clure clus/ clure  is:impe is:2sg
SFX xK clure cluons/ clure  is:impe is:1pl
SFX xK clure cluez/ clure  is:impe is:2pl
SFX xK clure clus-e/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xK clure clus-es/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xK clure clus·e·s/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xK clure clus-e-s/ clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl

SFX xL Y 56
SFX xL clure clure/ clure  is:infi
SFX xL clure cluant/ clure  is:ppre
SFX xL clure clus/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX xL clure cluse/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xL clure clus·e/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xL clure cluses/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xL clure clus·es/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xL clure clu/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX xL clure clus/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX xL clure clue/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX xL clure clu·e/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xL clure clues/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX xL clure clu·es/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xL clure clus/ clure  is:ipre is:ipsi is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xL clure clut/ clure  is:ipre is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX xL clure cluons/ clure  is:ipre is:1pl
SFX xL clure cluez/ clure  is:ipre is:2pl
SFX xL clure cluent/ clure  is:ipre is:spre is:3pl
SFX xL clure cluais/ clure  is:iimp is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xL clure cluait/ clure  is:iimp is:3sg
SFX xL clure cluions/ clure  is:iimp is:spre is:1pl
SFX xL clure cluiez/ clure  is:iimp is:spre is:2pl
SFX xL clure cluaient/ clure  is:iimp is:3pl
SFX xL clure clûmes/ clure  is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX xL clure clûtes/ clure  is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX xL clure clurent/ clure  is:ipsi is:3pl!
SFX xL clure clurai/ clure  is:ifut is:1sg
SFX xL clure cluras/ clure  is:ifut is:2sg
SFX xL clure clura/ clure  is:ifut is:3sg
SFX xL clure clurons/ clure  is:ifut is:1pl
SFX xL clure clurez/ clure  is:ifut is:2pl
SFX xL clure cluront/ clure  is:ifut is:3pl!
SFX xL clure clurais/ clure  is:cond is:1sg is:2sg
SFX xL clure clurait/ clure  is:cond is:3sg
SFX xL clure clurions/ clure  is:cond is:1pl
SFX xL clure cluriez/ clure  is:cond is:2pl
SFX xL clure cluraient/ clure  is:cond is:3pl
SFX xL clure clue/ clure  is:spre is:1sg is:3sg
SFX xL clure clues/ clure  is:spre is:2sg
SFX xL clure clusse/ clure  is:simp is:1sg
SFX xL clure clusses/ clure  is:simp is:2sg
SFX xL clure clût/ clure  is:simp is:3sg
SFX xL clure clussions/ clure  is:simp is:1pl
SFX xL clure clussiez/ clure  is:simp is:2pl
SFX xL clure clussent/ clure  is:simp is:3pl
SFX xL clure clus/ clure  is:impe is:2sg
SFX xL clure cluons/ clure  is:impe is:1pl
SFX xL clure cluez/ clure  is:impe is:2pl
SFX xL clure clus-e/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xL clure clus-es/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xL clure clu-e/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:sg
SFX xL clure clu-es/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xL clure clus·e·s/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xL clure clu·e·s/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xL clure clus-e-s/ inclure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
SFX xL clure clu-e-s/ [eo].clure  is:ppas po:adj is:incl is:pl
