viceverser/data/fr_ud.dic
boire/xC  po:verb
conclure/xL  po:verb
emboire/xC  po:verb
exclure/xL  po:verb
inclure/xL  po:verb
occlure/xK  po:verb
reboire/xC  po:verb
reclure/xJ  po:verb
